New York, session 2025-2026, A1446.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 295 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 19 to read as follows: 3 19. To mandate that all state employees shall annually attend a 4 bystander intervention training program developed by the division for 5 the prevention of sexual harassment. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 7 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02791-01-5